Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201354-1165
License fee;
payments; disposition.

Every livestock auction
market operator shall pay annually, on or before August 1, a market license
fee of one hundred fifty dollars to the department for each livestock
auction market operated by him or her, which payment shall constitute a renewal
for one year. Fees so paid shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Livestock Auction Market Fund for the expenses of administration of the
Livestock Auction Market Act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 9, p. 966;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 67;

Laws 2001, LB 197, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 5.
September 6, 2013